Nebraska, session 109, LB1196.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1196 LB1196
2026 2026
Section 1. (1) No state or local funds shall be allocated or
expended, either directly or indirectly, for any low-earning outcome
program as determined pursuant to 20 U.S.C. 1087d. This prohibition shall
include, but not be limited to, the following categories of postsecondary
education funding:
(a) Individual student financial aid;
(b) Base operational or instructional funding;
(c) Separately or specially appropriated aid or grants; and
(d) Capital or facilities funding.
(2) The Nebraska Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education
shall:
(a) Annually review updated federal determinations of low-earning
outcome programs; and
(b) Electronically submit an annual report to the Clerk of the
Legislature documenting:
(i) The federal determinations of low-earning outcome programs;
(ii) Enforcement of the provisions of subsection (1) of this
section; and
(iii) The estimated fiscal impact resulting from the provisions of
subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education may
adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the purposes of
this section.
-2-